District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.27

Fuel-efficient taxicabs.

(a)

Within 5 years of October 22, 2012, each owner of a licensed taxicab operating in the District shall maintain average vehicle greenhouse gas emissions at a level set by the Commission in consultation with the District Department of the Environment that will contribute to an overall goal of a 20% reduction in taxicab fleet greenhouse gas emissions by the year 2020. Wheelchair-accessible vehicles are exempt from compliance with greenhouse gas emission standards.

(b)

The Commission shall publicize on its website fuel-efficiency information available from DDOE about vehicles used as public vehicles-for-hire and, upon request, distribute this information at no charge to public vehicle-for-hire operators.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20h
as added Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(s), 59 DCR 9431
Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-270, § 2(g), 60 DCR 1717
2001 Ed., § 50-327.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 added this section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-270 rewrote (b), which read: “By April 1 of each year, the Commission, in consultation with DDOE, shall publicize a fuel-efficient taxicab guide. The guide shall list emission levels and average miles-per-gallon standards that will allow the District to achieve its taxicab fleet greenhouse gas reduction goal. The guide shall identify available funding sources and incentives for fuel-efficient and alternative-fuel vehicles. The Commission shall post the guide on its website and shall distribute the guide at no charge to taxicab operators. The Commission shall reevaluate and update the guide each year. The Commission may provide grants to owners of licensed taxicabs operating in the District to offset the cost of replacing an expired vehicle with an alternative-fuel vehicle as established by rulemaking. The Commission may issue rules and regulations to implement this section.”
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-270, § 5, see § 7017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-270, § 5, see 7017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-270 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.

Section 7017 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-270, § 5.